Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.050

Unlawful acts.

It is unlawful to:

(1) Market motor fuels in any manner that may deceive or tend to deceive the purchaser as to the nature, price, quantity, and quality of a motor fuel;

(2) Fail to register a motor fuel;

(3) Submit incorrect, misleading, or false information regarding the registration of a motor fuel;

(4) Hinder or obstruct the director, or his or her authorized agent, in the performance of his or her duties;

(5) Market a motor fuel that is contrary to this chapter.

[ 1990 c 102 s 6.]